North Carolina statutes. Chapter 158. Local Development.
Article 4. North Carolina’s Eastern Region.

§§ 158-30 through 158-42.
[Repealed]

Repealed effective June 30, 2014, by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 15.28(a), as amended by Session Laws 2013-363, s. 5.7(a).

History.

1993, c. 544, s. 1; 2005-364, s. 1; repealed by 2013-360, s. 15.28(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-3; 1993, c. 544, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 751, s. 1; 2005-364, s. 1; repealed by 2013-360, s. 15.28(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-32; 1993, c. 544, s. 1; 2005-364, s. 1; repealed by 2013-360, s. 15.28(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-33; 1993, c. 544, s. 1; 2005-364, s. 1; 2006-226, s. 26; 2006-264, s. 76.8; repealed by 2013-360, s. 15.28(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-33.1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 751, s. 2; 2005-364, s. 1; repealed by 2013-360, s. 15.28(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-34; 1993, c. 544, s. 1; 2005-364, s. 1; repealed by 2013-360, s. 15.28(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-35; 1993, c. 544, s. 1; 1998-217, s. 48; 2001-424, ss. 20.13(a), (b); 2001-496, s. 3.5; 2003-94, s. 1; 2005-364, s. 1; 2010-184, s. 5; repealed by 2013-360, s. 15.28(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-36; 1993, c. 544, s. 1; 2005-364, s. 1; repealed by 2013-360, s. 15.28(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-37; 1993, c. 544, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 745, ss. 30, 31; 2005-364, s. 1; repealed by 2013-360, s. 15.28(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-38; 1993, c. 544, s. 1; 2005-364, s. 1; repealed by 2013-360, s. 15.28(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-39; 1993, c. 544, s. 1; 2005-364, s. 1; repealed by 2013-360, s. 15.28(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-40; 1993, c. 544, s. 1; 2005-364, s. 1; repealed by 2013-360, s. 15.28(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-41; 1993, c. 544, s. 1; 2005-364, s. 1; 2013-256, ss. 2, 2.1; repealed by 2013-360, s. 15.28(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-42; 1993, c. 544, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 751, s. 3; c. 761, s. 33; 1995, c. 465, s. 1; 2005-364, s. 1; 2013-256, ss. 1, 2.1; repealed by 2013-360, s. 15.28(a), effective June 30, 2014.